Wyoming statutes. Title 33 Professions and Occupations
Chapter 20 Merchants: Itinerant, Temporary or Transient

Cross references. —

As to licensing provisions generally, see chapter 1 of this title.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

51 Am. Jur. 2d Licenses and Permits § 76; 60 Am. Jur. 2d Peddlers, Solicitors and Transient Dealers § 1 et seq.

Validity of municipal regulation of solicitation of magazine subscriptions, 9 ALR2d 728.

Validity of municipal ordinance prohibiting house-to-house soliciting or peddling without invitation, 35 ALR2d 355.

Construction and application of municipal ordinance prohibiting house-to-house soliciting and peddling without invitation, 77 ALR2d 1216.

Authorization, prohibition or regulation by municipality of the sale of merchandise on streets or highways or their use for such purpose, 14 ALR3d 896.

Civil liability of mobile vendor for attracting into street child injured by another's motor vehicle, 84 ALR3d 826.

39A C.J.S. Hawkers and Peddlers §§ 1 to 12.